Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,105
Immunity of state reserved; exception.

From and after August 27, 1971, the authority of any state agency to sue or be sued in its own name shall not be construed to authorize suits against such state agency on workers' compensation claims except as authorized in sections 48-192 to 48-1,109. The remedies provided by sections 48-192 to 48-1,109 in such cases shall be exclusive.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 14;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 131.